Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,241
Compliance with code at time of installation; notification of dangerous condition.

Under the Conveyance Safety Act, conveyances shall be required to comply with the code standards applicable at the time such conveyance was or is installed. However, if, upon the inspection of any conveyance, (1) the conveyance is found to be in a dangerous condition or there is an immediate hazard to those using such conveyance or (2) the design or the method of operation in combination with devices used is inherently dangerous, the state elevator inspector shall notify the owner of the conveyance of such condition and shall order such alterations or additions as may be deemed necessary to eliminate the dangerous condition.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 32;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2532;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 77.